Massachusetts, session 194th, H4807.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 93H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Agency”, and inserting in
place thereof the following 3 definitions:-
“Access device”, a card or other device that contains a magnetic stripe, microprocessor
chip or other means for storage of personal information.
''Agency'', any agency, executive office, department, board, commission, bureau, division
or authority of the commonwealth, or any of its branches, or of any political subdivision thereof.
“Biometric indicator”, any unique biological attribute or measurement data that can be
used to authenticate the identity of a resident, including, but not limited to fingerprint, iris or
retina patterns, voice print, facial characteristics or hand geometry; provided, however, it shall
not include a physical or digital photograph or a video or audio recording or data generated
therefrom, or information collected, used, or stored for health care treatment, payment, or
of 6

operations under the federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and its
implementing regulations.
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 93H of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting after the definition of “Encrypted”, the following 2
definitions:-
“Information security program”, the administrative, technical or physical safeguards used
to access, collect, distribute, process, protect, store, use, transmit, dispose of or otherwise handle
personal information.
“Neural data”, information generated by measuring the activity of a resident’s central or
peripheral nervous system, and that is not inferred from nonneural data.
SECTION 3. Said section 1 of said chapter 93H of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by striking out the definitions of “Personal information” and “Substitute
notice”, and inserting in place thereof the following definitions:-
''Personal information'', a resident's first name and last name or first initial and last name
in combination with any 1 or more of the following data elements that relate to such resident:
(a) Social Security number;
(b) driver's license number, state-issued identification card number, or federal-issued
identification number;
(c) health insurance policy number or health insurance identification number;
of 6

(d) any information about a resident’s medical or medication history, bodily functions,
vital signs, measurements, or symptoms, or mental or physical condition, or about a health care
professional’s medical diagnosis or treatment of the resident;
(e) precise location information;
(f) a user-name or electronic mail address in combination with a password or security
question and answer that would permit access to a resident’s account;
(g) neural data;
(h) a biometric indicator; or
(i) financial account number, or credit or debit card number, with or without any required
security code, access code, personal identification number or password, that would permit access
to a resident's financial account; provided, however, that ''Personal information'' shall not include
information that is lawfully obtained from publicly available information, or from federal, state
or local government records lawfully made available to the general public.
“Precise location information”, data derived from technology, including, but not limited
to global positioning system level latitude and longitude coordinates or other mechanisms, that
directly identifies the specific location of a resident with precision and accuracy within a radius
of 1,750 feet; provided, however, precise location information shall not include the content of
communications or any data generated by or connected to advanced utility metering
infrastructure systems or equipment for use by a utility.
“Service provider”, a person that stores, processes or transmits access device data on
behalf of another person or agency.
of 6

''Substitute notice'', shall consist of all of the following:—
(i) electronic mail notice, if the person or agency has electronic mail addresses for the
members of the affected class of Massachusetts residents except if the breached personal
information includes a user-name or electronic mail address in combination with a password or
security question and answer that would permit access to an account, in which case a person
shall instead provide clear and conspicuous notice delivered to the resident online when the
resident is connected to the online account from an internet protocol address or from an online
location which the person knows the resident customarily uses to access the online account;
(ii) clear and conspicuous posting of the notice on the home page of the person or agency
if the person or agency maintains a website; and
(iii) publication in or broadcast through media or medium that provides notice throughout
the commonwealth.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of said chapter 93H of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out subsection (a), and inserting in place thereof the following
subsection:-
(a) The department of consumer affairs and business regulation shall adopt regulations
relative to any person that owns or licenses personal information about a resident of the
commonwealth. Such regulations shall be designed to safeguard the personal information of
residents of the commonwealth and shall be consistent with the safeguards for protection of
personal information set forth in the federal regulations by which the person is regulated. The
objectives of the regulations shall be to: insure the security and confidentiality of customer
information in a manner fully consistent with industry standards; protect against anticipated
of 6

threats or hazards to the security or integrity of such information; oversee third-party service
providers by taking reasonable steps to select and retain by written contract third-party service
providers that are capable of maintaining appropriate safeguards for personal information; and
protect against unauthorized access to or use of such information that may result in substantial
harm or inconvenience to any consumer. The regulations shall take into account the person's
size, scope and type of business, the amount of resources available to such person, the amount of
stored data, and the need for security and confidentiality of both consumer and employee
information.
SECTION 5. Section 3 of said chapter 93H of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out the third paragraph of subsection (b), and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
The notice to be provided to the resident shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) the
resident's right to obtain a police report; (ii) a time frame of exposure, if known, including the
date of the breach of security and the date of the discovery of said breach; (iii) how a resident
may request a security freeze and the necessary information to be provided when requesting the
security freeze; (iv) that there shall be no charge for a security freeze; and (v) mitigation services
to be provided pursuant to this chapter; provided, however, that said notice shall not include the
nature of the breach of security or unauthorized acquisition or use, or the number of residents of
the commonwealth affected by said breach of security or unauthorized access or use. The person
or agency that experienced the breach of security shall provide a sample copy of the notice it sent
to consumers to the attorney general and the office of consumer affairs and business regulation.
A notice provided pursuant to this section shall not be delayed on grounds that the total number
of residents affected is not yet ascertained. In such case, and where otherwise necessary to
of 6

update or correct the information required, a person or agency shall provide additional notice as
soon as practicable and without unreasonable delay upon learning such additional information.
100 SECTION 6. Said section 3 of said chapter 93H of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
101 hereby further amended by striking out subsection (f), and inserting in place thereof the
102 following 2 subsections:-
103 (f) Notice to affected residents under this section is not required if the exposure of the
104 personal information was an inadvertent disclosure by persons authorized to access such personal
105 information, and the person reasonably determines such exposure will not likely result in misuse
106 of such personal information, financial harm to the affected residents or emotional harm in the
107 case of unknown disclosure. Such a determination must be documented in writing and
108 maintained for at least 5 years. If the incident affects over 500 residents of the commonwealth,
109 the person shall provide the written determination to the office of the attorney general within 10
110 days after the determination.
111 (g) The department of consumer affairs and business regulation may promulgate
112 regulations interpreting and applying this section.
of 6